New York, session 2025-2026, A7659.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 839-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 839-a. Motorcycle profiling. 1. The municipal police training coun- 4 cil shall ensure that issues related to motorcycle profiling are 5 addressed in basic law enforcement training and offered to in-service 6 law enforcement officers in conjunction with existing training regarding 7 profiling. 8 2. Local law enforcement agencies shall add a statement condemning 9 motorcycle profiling to existing policies regarding profiling. 10 3. For the purposes of this section, "motorcycle profiling" means the 11 illegal use of the fact that a person rides a motorcycle or wears motor- 12 cycle-related paraphernalia as a factor in deciding to stop and ques- 13 tion, take enforcement action, arrest, or search a person or vehicle 14 with or without a legal basis under the United States constitution or 15 New York state constitution. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 18 repeal of any rules or regulations necessary for the implementation of 19 the foregoing provisions of this act on its effective date are author- 20 ized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00463-01-5